src/fst/test/old-gt-norm-yamls/V-AI-nehiyawew_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - nêhiyawêw - help : # Ordinary VAI verb - full  Wolvengrey p. 395; Fut+Def from Okimāsis p. 36

     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: ninêhiyawân
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kinêhiyawân
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: nêhiyawêw
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl: nêhiyawêyiwa
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: ninêhiyawânân
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kinêhiyawânaw, kinêhiyawânânaw]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kinêhiyawânâwâw
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: nêhiyawêwak

     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Prt+1Sg: [nikî-nêhiyawân]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Prt+2Sg: [kikî-nêhiyawân]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kî-nêhiyawêw]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Prt+4Sg/Pl: [kî-nêhiyawêyiwa]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Prt+1Pl: [nikî-nêhiyawânân]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Prt+12Pl: [kikî-nêhiyawânaw, kikî-nêhiyawânânaw]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Prt+2Pl: [kikî-nêhiyawânâwâw]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Prt+3Pl: [kî-nêhiyawêwak]
     
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg: [nika-nêhiyawân]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg: [kika-nêhiyawân]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg: [ka-nêhiyawêw]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+4Sg/Pl: [ka-nêhiyawêyiwa]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl: [nika-nêhiyawânân]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl: [kika-nêhiyawânaw, kika-nêhiyawânânaw]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl: [kika-nêhiyawânâwâw]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl: [ka-nêhiyawêwak]
     
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg: [niwî-nêhiyawân]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg: [kiwî-nêhiyawân]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg: [wî-nêhiyawêw]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: [wî-nêhiyawêyiwa]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl: [niwî-nêhiyawânân]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl: [kiwî-nêhiyawânaw, kiwî-nêhiyawânânaw]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl: [kiwî-nêhiyawânâwâw]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl: [wî-nêhiyawêwak]
     
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-nêhiyawêyân]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-nêhiyawêyan]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-nêhiyawêt]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl: [ê-nêhiyawêyit]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-nêhiyawêyâhk]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-nêhiyawêyahk]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-nêhiyawêyêk]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-nêhiyawêcik]
     
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-nêhiyawêyân]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-nêhiyawêyan]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-nêhiyawêt]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl: [ê-nêhiyawêyit]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-nêhiyawêyâhk]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-nêhiyawêyahk]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-nêhiyawêyêk]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-nêhiyawêcik]
         
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+1Sg: [ê-kî-nêhiyawêyân]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+2Sg: [ê-kî-nêhiyawêyan]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: [ê-kî-nêhiyawêt]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+4Sg/Pl: [ê-kî-nêhiyawêyit]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+1Pl: [ê-kî-nêhiyawêyâhk]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+12Pl: [ê-kî-nêhiyawêyahk]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+2Pl: [ê-kî-nêhiyawêyêk]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: [ê-kî-nêhiyawêcik]
     
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Sg: [ê-wî-nêhiyawêyân]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Sg: [ê-wî-nêhiyawêyan]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Sg: [ê-wî-nêhiyawêt]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: [ê-wî-nêhiyawêyit]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Pl: [ê-wî-nêhiyawêyâhk]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+12Pl: [ê-wî-nêhiyawêyahk]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Pl: [ê-wî-nêhiyawêyêk]
     PV/e+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Pl: [ê-wî-nêhiyawêcik]
    
    
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmâw] # COMM SET I
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmâw]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmânân]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmânaw]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmâwâw]
     
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmâwak] # COMM SET I-Pl
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmâwak]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmânânak]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmânawak]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmâwâwak]

     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmin] # COMM SET II
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêminân]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêminâwâw]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêminân]


     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nêhiyawêmêw] # COMM SET III
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nêhiyawêmêwak]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nêhiyawêmêyiwa]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nêhiyawêmimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nêhiyawêmimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmimâwa] # COMM SET IV
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmimâwa]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmimânâna]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmimânawa]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmimâwâwa]
    
     
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: nêhiyawêyâni
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: nêhiyawêyani
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: nêhiyawêci
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: nêhiyawêyici
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: nêhiyawêyâhki
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: [nêhiyawêyahko, nêhiyawêyahki]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: nêhiyawêyêko
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: nêhiyawêtwâwi
     
     


     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: nêhiyawê
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: nêhiyawêtân
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: nêhiyawêk
     
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: nêhiyawêhkan
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Imp+Del+12Pl: nêhiyawêhkahk
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: nêhiyawêhkêk
